Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB501.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 315 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, when a pharmacist is aware that a practitioner
has died, a prescription issued by that practitioner may continue to be dispensed based on the pharmacist's
professional judgment and no later than one hundred eighty (180) days following the date on which the
practitioner died.
(2) Nothing in this section authorizes the dispensing of a prescription that was issued for a controlled
substance unless permitted under the federal Controlled Substances Act and regulations of the United
States Drug Enforcement Administration.
Section 2. 2025 RS HB 495/VO, Section 1, is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and unless required under federal law, the Department for
Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of
Medicaid services are hereby prohibited from expending any Medicaid funds on any of the following:
(1) Cross-sex hormones when prescribed or administered primarily or solely for the treatment of gender
dysphoria[in amounts greater than would normally be produced endogenously in a healthy person of the same
age and sex]; and
(2) Gender reassignment surgery to alter or remove physical or anatomical characteristics or features that are
typical for and characteristic of a person's biological sex.
Became law without Governor's signature April 10, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version